Washington statutes.
RCW 35.100.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Community revitalization project" means:

(a) Health and safety improvements authorized to be publicly financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81 RCW;

(b) Publicly owned or leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the sponsor has authority to provide; and

(c) Expenditure for any of the following purposes:

(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within a downtown or neighborhood commercial district including the management and promotion of retail trade activities in the district;

(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas in the downtown or neighborhood commercial district;

(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395; or

(iv) Project design and planning, land acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, operation, and installation of a public facility; the costs of financing, including interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, and insurance; the costs of complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and the administrative costs reasonably necessary and related to these costs.

(2) "Downtown or neighborhood commercial district" means (a) an area or areas designated by the legislative authority of a city or town with a population over one hundred thousand and that are typically limited to the pedestrian core area or the central commercial district and compact business districts that serve specific neighborhoods within the city or town; or (b) commercial areas designated as main street areas by the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(3) "Local retail sales and use tax" means the tax levied by a city or town under RCW 82.14.030, excluding that portion which a county is entitled to receive under RCW 82.14.030.

(4) "Local retail sales and use tax increment revenue" means that portion of the local retail sales and use tax collected in each year upon any retail sale or any use of an article of tangible personal property within a downtown or neighborhood commercial district that is in excess of the amount of local retail sales and use tax collected on sales or uses within the downtown or neighborhood commercial district in the year preceding.

[ 2010 c 30 s 2; 2002 c 79 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Finding—Effective date—2010 c 30: See notes following RCW 43.360.010.